Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 7

Nominations and Primary Elections

Subchapter 1

— Methods of Nomination

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 901, § 17, repealed §7-7-106, a code section number that at the time did not exist.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§7-7-101 —7-7-105 may not apply to §7-7-106 which was enacted subsequently.

Cross References.

Sufficiency of initiative and referendum petitions, §§7-9-111,7-9-112.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 5: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas the great majority of municipalities elect their municipal officials as independents and do not have political primaries for municipal office and whereas the great majority of municipal officials in small towns and cities receive no compensation or very nominal compensation and it would result in a real hardship to force candidates for municipal office in these small towns and cities to run in primaries and to file for municipal office seven (7) months before the general election and nine (9) months before the taking of office on January 1; and this act is immediately necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect immediately on its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 731, § 3: Mar. 24, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly that this act is necessary for the continued proper operation of the electoral process in the State of Arkansas, now therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2014, No. 210, §
3: Feb. 28, 2014. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current time allotted for special elections to fill vacancies in certain offices is often rendered impracticable by legal and practical considerations associated with holding a statewide special election. The General Assembly further finds that because statewide special elections cost in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), the Governor should have the discretion to determine whether special elections to fill certain vacancies are impractical because of the timing of the vacancy and that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the state to avoid election expenses that the Governor determines are impractical. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-7-101. Selection of nominees.

The name of no person shall be printed on the ballot in any general or special election in this state as a candidate for election to any office unless the person shall have been certified as a nominee selected pursuant to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 5; 1971, No. 261, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 1; 1975, No. 700, § 1; 1977, No. 731, § 1; 1981, No. 960, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-105.

7-7-102. Party nominees certified at primary election.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nominees of any political party for United States Senate, United States House of Representatives, or state, district, county, township, or applicable municipal office to be voted upon at a general election shall be certified as having received a majority of the votes cast for the office, or as an unopposed candidate, at a primary election held by the political party in the manner provided by law.

(b)

A new political party established by petition shall nominate any candidate by convention for the first general election after certification of a sufficient petition.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 5; 1971, No. 261, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 1; 1975, No. 700, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-105; Acts 2009, No. 959, § 34; 2011, No. 1036, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (b); and inserted “township, or applicable municipal” and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment added (b); and added “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” in (a).

7-7-103. Filing as an independent — Petitions — Disqualification.

(a)(1)

A person desiring to have his or her name placed upon the ballot as an independent candidate without political party affiliation for any United States office other than President of the United States or Vice President of the United States or state, county, township, or district office in any general election in this state shall file, during the party filing period for the year in which the election is to be held, a political practices pledge, an affidavit of eligibility, and a notice of candidacy stating the name and title the candidate proposes to appear on the ballot and identifying the elective office sought, including the position number, if any.

(2)(A)

An independent candidate shall state the same position, including the position number, if any, on his or her petition.

(B)

When a candidate has identified the position sought on the notice of candidacy, the candidate shall not be allowed to change the position but may withdraw a notice of candidacy and file a new notice of candidacy designating a different position before the deadline for filing.

(b)(1)(A)

The person shall furnish by 12:00 noon on May 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held petitions signed by not less than three percent (3%) of the qualified electors in the county, township, or district in which the person is seeking office, but in no event shall more than two thousand (2,000) signatures be required for a district, county, or township office.

(B)

If the person is a candidate for state office or for United States Senator in which a statewide race is required, the person shall file petitions signed by not less than three percent (3%) of the qualified electors of the state or which contain ten thousand (10,000) signatures of qualified electors, whichever is the lesser.

(2)

Each elector signing the petition shall be a registered voter, and the petition shall be directed to the official with whom the person is required by law to file the petition to qualify as a candidate and shall request that the name of the person be placed on the ballot for election to the office mentioned in the petition.

(3)(A)

A petition shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State that includes without limitation a designated space for:

(i)

The signature of the qualified elector;

(ii)

The printed name of the qualified elector;

(iii)

The date of the signature of the qualified elector; and

(iv)

The address of the qualified elector.

(B)

A petition shall be circulated not earlier than ninety (90) calendar days before the deadline for filing petitions to qualify as an independent candidate unless the number of days is reduced by a proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document for a special election under §7-11-101 et seq.

(C)(i)

The person filing for office as an independent candidate shall submit with the petition an affidavit that swears:

(a)

The signatures were not collected for a period over ninety (90) days;

(b)

The beginning and ending dates for collection of signatures on the petition are those as indicated on the affidavit; and

(c)

The signatures were collected and the petition was executed and submitted in compliance with the law.

(ii)

The affidavit under subdivision (b)(3)(C)(i) of this section shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(4)

In determining the number of qualified electors in any county, township, or district or in the state, the total number of votes cast therein for all candidates in the preceding general election for the office of Governor shall be conclusive of the number of qualified electors therein for the purposes of this section.

(5)

If the number of days in which the petition for independent candidacy may be circulated is reduced by a proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document for a special election under §7-11-101 et seq., the number of signatures required on the petition shall be reduced proportionately.

(c)

Signatures that are incorrectly obtained or submitted under this section shall not be counted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 5; 1971, No. 261, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, §§ 1, 2; 1975, No. 700, § 1; 1977, No. 731, § 1; 1981, No. 960, § 1; 1985, No. 1055, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-105, 3-105.1; Acts 1989, No. 591, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 512, § 7; 1997, No. 886, § 2; 1999, No. 77, § 1; 2001, No. 472, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 19; 2001, No. 1789, § 6; 2003, No. 1165, § 6; 2003, No. 1731, § 3; 2005, No. 67, § 16; 2007, No. 1020, § 13; 2007, No. 1049, § 21; 2009, No. 188, § 1; 2009, No. 1480, § 41; 2013, No. 1356, § 1; 2015, No. 340, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 68, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 1020 inserted “12:00 noon on” in (b)(1)(A); and substituted “the petition” for “nomination certificates” in (b)(2).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049, in (b), added “unless the number of days is reduced by a proclamation, ordinance, resolution, or order of special election under §7-5-103” in (3), and added (5); in (c)(2)(A), substituted “ninety (90)” for “eighty (80)” and “seventy (70)” for “sixty (60)”; and inserted “or she” in (e).

The 2009 amendment by No. 188 substituted “ninety (90)” for “sixty (60)” in (b)(3), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 rewrote (a); substituted “order, or other authorized document for a special election under §7-11-101 et seq.” for “or order of special election under §7-5-103” or variants in (b)(3) and (b)(5); and deleted (c) through (f).

The 2013 amendment inserted “the petition under this section” in (a)(1); substituted “file” for “furnish by 12:00 noon on May 1 of the year in which the election is to be held” in (b)(1)(A).

The 2015 amendment added present (b)(3)(A); redesignated (b)(3) as (b)(3)(B); substituted “A petition” for “Petitions” in (b)(3)(B); added (b)(3)(C): and added (c).

The 2019 amendment deleted “the petition under this section” following “affidavit of eligibility” in (a)(1); and substituted “furnish by 12:00 noon on May 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held” for “file” in (b)(1)(A).

7-7-104. Vacancy in nomination — Alternative methods for filling — Tie vote.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nominees of a political party to fill a vacancy in nomination, as defined in §7-1-101, shall be declared by:

(1)

Certificate of the chair and secretary of any convention of delegates held following receipt of the Governor's letter certifying vacancy; or

(2)(A)

A special primary election called, held, and conducted in accordance with the rules of the party.

(B)

A special primary election may be called only if the special primary election can be called, held, conducted, and certified and certificates of nomination filed at least seventy (70) days before the general election.

(b)(1)

In case of a tie vote for the same office at a general primary election, a vacancy in nomination for that office shall exist.

(2)(A)

Nominees of a political party to fill a vacancy in nomination resulting from a tie vote for the same office at a general primary election shall be declared by certificate of the chair and secretary of an appropriate convention of delegates held following receipt of the Governor's letter certifying a vacancy.

(B)

A convention of delegates shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the party.

(c)(1)

When a vacancy in nomination occurs as a result of death or when the person who received the majority of votes cast at the preferential primary election or the general primary election notifies the state committee of the political party of his or her intent to refuse nomination due to serious illness, moving out of the area from which elected as the party's nominee, or filing for another office, the state committee of the political party shall notify the Governor within ten (10) calendar days after the date of death or the date the party was notified of intent to refuse nomination as to whether the party chooses to fill the vacancy in nomination at a special election or a convention.

(2)

If the party fails to notify the Governor within the ten-calendar-day period, the vacancy in nomination shall not be filled nor shall the vacancy in nomination be filled if it occurred for any reason other than death, serious illness, the candidate's moving out of the area from which elected as the party's nominee, or filing for another office.

(d)(1)

If the party notifies the Governor within the time prescribed in subsection (c) of this section of the desire to have a special primary election, the Governor shall issue a proclamation within five (5) days calling the special election and establishing the deadline for filing as a candidate for nomination, drawing for ballot position, and issuing and filing certificates of nomination. The special primary election shall occur no earlier than thirty (30) days nor later than sixty (60) days after the filing deadline. The candidate who receives the most votes in the special primary election shall be declared the nominee. There shall be no runoff election. In the event of a tie for the most votes, the nominee shall be determined by lot in a public meeting of the appropriate party committee.

(2)

When the certificate of nomination is filed for a nominee who is filling a vacancy in nomination, the filing authority shall immediately certify the name of the nominee to the appropriate county board of election commissioners.

(e)

If the party notifies the Governor that it desires to fill the vacancy in nomination by convention, the convention shall occur and be conducted in accordance with respective political party rules after the notice is provided to the Governor.

(f)(1)

If the party's nominee is not selected in time to file his or her certificate of nomination with the appropriate party authority at least seventy-six (76) days before the general election, the nominee's name shall not appear on the general election ballot but the name of the person who vacated the nomination shall appear on the ballot, and votes cast for the name of the person appearing on the ballot shall be counted for the nominee but only if the certificate of nomination is duly filed at least forty-seven (47) days before the general election.

(2)(A)

If votes for a nominee whose name does not appear on the ballot are to be counted under subdivision (f)(1) of this section, the county board of election commissioners shall post a notice at each affected polling place stating each election in which a vote for the person appearing on the ballot shall be counted for the nominee.

(B)

A copy of the notice shall be included with the instructions sent to absentee voters.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, §§ 5, 10; 1971, No. 261, §§ 3, 4; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 1; 1975, No. 700, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-105, 3-110; Acts 1997, No. 1082, § 3; 2005, No. 2145, § 12; 2007, No. 1049, § 22; 2011, No. 203, §
2; 2011, No. 1185, § 8; 2019, No. 648, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted (a)(2)(B); rewrote (e); added (g); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 203 added the exception in (a); redesignated former (b) as present (b)(1); added (b)(2); redesignated former (c) as present (c)(1); redesignated former (d) as present (c)(2); redesignated former (e) as present (d); redesignated former (f) as present (e)(1), and added (e)(2) and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly; and substituted “(f)(1)” for “(g)(1)” in (f)(2)(A).

The 2011 amendment by No. 1185, substituted “seventy-six (76)” for “sixty-six (66)” and “forty-seven (47)” for “thirty-five (35)” in current (f)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “following receipt” for “within twenty-five (25) days” in (a)(1) and (b)(2)(A); substituted “ten (10) calendar days” for “five (5) days” in (c)(1); substituted “ten-calendar-day period” for “five-day period” in (c)(2); substituted “and be conducted in accordance with respective political party rules” for “no later than twenty-five (25) days” in (e); and deleted (e)(2).

7-7-105. Filling vacancies in certain offices — Special primary elections.

(a)

Nominees for special elections called for the purpose of filling a vacancy in office for a member of the United States House of Representatives, Lieutenant Governor, or for a member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the General Assembly shall be chosen as follows:

(1)

The Governor shall certify in writing to the state committees of the respective political parties the fact of vacancy and shall request the respective state committees to make a determination and notify him or her in writing within ten (10) days with respect to whether the political parties desire to hold a special primary election or a convention of delegates held under party rules to choose nominees;

(2)(A)

If the state committee of any political party timely notifies the Governor that it chooses to hold a special primary election, any political party desiring to choose a nominee shall choose the nominee at a special primary election.

(B)

The Governor's proclamation shall set dates for the special primary election and the runoff primary election to be held if no candidate receives a majority of the vote at the special primary election; and

(3)(A)(i)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a special election to fill the vacancy in office shall be held on a date as soon as possible after the vacancy occurs.

(ii)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3)(A)(iii) of this section, the special election shall be held not more than one hundred fifty (150) days after the occurrence of the vacancy.

(iii)

If the Governor determines it is impracticable or unduly burdensome to hold the special election within one hundred fifty (150) days after the occurrence of the vacancy, the special election shall be held as soon as practicable after the one-hundred-fiftieth day following the occurrence of the vacancy.

(B)

The special election shall be held in accordance with laws governing special elections.

(C)(i)

If a nominee is to be chosen at a special primary election and if, after the close of the filing period, only one (1) or two (2) candidates have filed for the nomination of a party holding a primary, the state committee of a party holding a primary shall notify the Governor.

(ii)

The Governor shall issue a new proclamation setting the special election for an earlier date so long as the earlier date is in accordance with state laws governing special elections.

(b)

If no state committee of any political party timely notifies the Governor of the desire to hold a special primary election or convention, the Governor, in issuing his or her proclamation calling for the special election, shall declare that the nominee of a political party shall be chosen at a convention.

(c)

A special election for a vacancy in the office of Lieutenant Governor shall not be held if:

(1)

The vacancy occurs less than ten (10) months before the next scheduled general election;

(2)

The office of Lieutenant Governor would in regular course be filled at the next scheduled general election; and

(3)

The Governor determines that the cost of holding a special election for a vacancy in the office of Lieutenant Governor less than ten (10) months before the office will be filled at the next scheduled general election is impractical because of the timing of the vacancy.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 5; 1971, No. 261, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 1; 1975, No. 700, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-105; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 1; 1993, No. 512, § 8; 1997, No. 1082, § 2; 2005, No. 2145, § 13; 2007, No. 1049, § 23; 2009, No. 1480, § 42; 2014, No. 210, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2014, No. 210, § 2, provided: “Section 1 of this act applies to a vacancy occurring on or after January 1, 2014.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendment redesignated former (a)(3)(A) as (a)(3)(A)(i) and added “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” to the beginning and deleted “but not more than one hundred fifty (150) days after the occurrence of the vacancy” from the end; and added (a)(3)(A)(ii)-(iii) and (c).

7-7-106. Filling vacancies in candidacy for nomination — Preferential primary.

(a)

A political party may fill a vacancy if:

(1)

A person is running unopposed in a preferential primary and cannot accept the nomination due to death; or

(2)

A person is running unopposed in a preferential primary and notifies the party that he or she will not accept the nomination due to a serious illness.

(b)

The vacancy shall be filled in accordance with respective political party rules.

(c)

If the vacancy is filled more than sixty-six (66) days before the preferential primary election, the name of the person filling the vacancy shall be printed on the ballot instead of the name of the person who vacated the candidacy.

(d)

If the vacancy is filled less than sixty-six (66) days before the date of the preferential primary election, the name of the person subsequently elected to fill the vacancy in candidacy shall be declared the nominee even if the name of the person who vacated the candidacy appears on the preferential primary ballot.

(e)

If the vacancy in candidacy is not filled before the date of the preferential primary election, a vacancy in nomination shall be deemed to exist on the date of the preferential primary election and the vacancy in nomination shall be filled under §7-7-104.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1772, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 24; 2013, No. 1126, § 13; 2019, No. 648, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “candidacy for nomination” for “certain offices” in the section heading; and added (d) through (f).

The 2013 amendment substituted “A person is running unopposed in a preferential primary and notifies” for “Upon notification to” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “in accordance with respective political party rules” for “within ten (10) calendar days after the death or notification to the political party” in (b); deleted former (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and inserted “election” in (d).

Subchapter 2

— Primary Elections Generally

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 347, § 13: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the people of Arkansas have an immediate need for a greater sense of participation in the political process at all levels. Accordingly, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public interest, health, safety, and welfare, shall be effective from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 6: Feb. 16, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the dates of the 1972 national nominating conventions and primary elections are fast approaching, that the people of the state are in immediate need of a resolution of uncertainties that have arisen with respect to the selection of delegates and alternates thereto, and that the effective administration of the election laws of this state requires that the dates of the primary elections now fixed by law be advanced. Accordingly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public health, interest, safety, and welfare, shall be effective immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 901, § 21: Apr. 4, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state should provide for a state supported political primary system; and that this act should become effective immediately for the proper administration of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, §
8: May 29, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that independent candidates may circulate petitions for candidacy for ninety (90) days before the deadline for filing as a candidate for office; and that without an emergency clause, the effective date of this act will cause confusion regarding the rights and interests of independent candidates and the time period for circulating petitions for candidacy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 164, § 2: Feb. 18, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws concerning signature requirements for certain petitions are insufficient to reflect the will of the voters of Arkansas; that this act must become effective before the date upon which petitions can be circulated in order to preserve fair access to the elections; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure voter and candidate rights are observed in the upcoming election. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

7-7-201. Law governing primary elections.

(a)

The cost of political party primaries shall be borne by the State of Arkansas and shall be paid from an appropriation made to the State Board of Election Commissioners for that purpose.

(b)(1)

Within each county, the political party primary elections shall be conducted by the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall have authority to adopt rules for the administration of primary elections consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(3)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may withhold reimbursement of funds to the counties for state-funded elections for failure to comply with the rules developed by the State Board of Election Commissioners for the administration of primary elections or applicable state election laws until all requirements are met to the satisfaction of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(4)

Each political party shall be responsible for determining the qualifications of candidates seeking nomination by the political party, provide necessary applications for candidacy, accept and process the applications, and determine the order of its ballot.

(c)

All political party primary elections shall be conducted in conformity with the provisions of this act, and these elections are declared to be legal elections.

(d)

In cases of circumstances or procedures which may arise in connection with any primary election for which there is no provision of this act governing the circumstances or procedures, they shall be governed by the general election laws of this state or by party rules if there is no applicable general election law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-107; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 2; 2001, No. 1175, § 1; 2007, No. 987, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted former (b)(1) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and deleted “under the direction of the state board” following “commissioners” in present (b)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401 —7-5-403,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-514 [repealed],7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

7-7-202. Preferential and general primaries — When required — Common polling places.

(a)

Whenever any political party shall select by primary election party nominees as candidates at any general election for any United States, state, district, county, township, or municipal office, there shall be held a preferential primary election and a general primary election, if required, on the respective dates provided in §7-7-203(a) and (b).

(b)

A general primary election for a political party shall not be held if there are no races in which three (3) or more candidates qualify for the same office or position as provided in subsection (c) of this section unless a general primary election is necessary to break a tie vote for the same office or position at the preferential primary.

(c)

If there are no races in which three (3) or more candidates qualify for the same office or position, only the preferential primary election shall be held for the political party. If all nominations have been determined at the preferential primary election or by withdrawal of candidates as provided in §7-7-304(a) and (b), the general primary election shall not be held.

(d)

The county board of election commissioners shall establish common polling places for the joint conduct of the primary elections of all political parties.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, §§ 8, 10; 1971, No. 261, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-108, 3-110; Acts 1995, No. 901, § 3; 2005, No. 67, § 17; 2009, No. 959, § 35.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “if required” in (a), and made related changes.